Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4968.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin HEALTH APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin The dollar amounts shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, are subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 21, from the general fund or any named fund and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the addition to or subtraction from the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMISSIONER OF HEALTHnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 627,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 400,000 new text end new text begin 627,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Health Improvement new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin 627,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin State Government Special Revenue new text end new text begin 440,000 new text end new text begin 627,000 new text end new text begin (a) $440,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $440,000 in fiscal year 2027 are from the state government special revenue fund to the commissioner of health for administering licensing and regulation of HMOs under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 62D. In fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter, the base for this appropriation is increased by $440,000. new text end new text begin (b) $187,000 in fiscal year 2027 is from the state government special revenue fund to the commissioner of health for administering all-payer claims data under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 62U. The base for this appropriation is increased by $234,000 in fiscal year 2028 and by $292,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 2, paragraph (a), is effective if the commissioner of health retains authority for administering licensing and regulation of HMOs under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 62D, by June 30, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2024, chapter 127, article 67, section 7, is amended to read: Sec. 7. BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF MNSURE $ -0- $ 2,330,000 (a) Information Technology deleted text begin to Implement Federal Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals Regulatory Requirementsdeleted text end . $2,330,000 in fiscal year 2025 is deleted text begin for information technology to implement federal Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals regulatory requirementsdeleted text end new text begin to authorize MNsure to use funds for broader technology and operational needs. This appropriation supports information technology enhancements, system readiness, consumer communications, and operational adjustments to maintain service continuity and improve the consumer experiencenew text end . This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. (b) Transfer to Enterprise Account. The Board of Directors of MNsure must transfer $2,330,000 in fiscal year 2025 from the general fund to the enterprise account under Minnesota Statutes, section 62V.07. This is a onetime transfer. Sec. 4. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 3, article 21, section 3, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Substance Use Treatment, Recovery, and Prevention Grants $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are from the general fund for substance use treatment, recovery, and prevention grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 342.72.new text begin The commissioner may use up to $300,000 of this appropriation for administration.new text end ARTICLE 2 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH POLICY CHANGES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Expanded access to and use of the all-payer claims data. (a) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall make the data submitted under subdivisions 4, 5, 5a, and 5b, including data classified as private or nonpublic, available to individuals and organizations engaged in research on, or efforts to effect transformation in, health care outcomes, access, quality, disparities, or spending, provided the use of the data serves a public benefit. Data made available under this subdivision may not be used to: (1) create an unfair market advantage for any participant in the health care market in Minnesota, including health plan companies, payers, and providers; (2) reidentify or attempt to reidentify an individual in the data; or (3) publicly report contract details between a health plan company and provider and derived from the data. (b) To implement paragraph (a), the commissioner shall: (1) establish detailed requirements for data access; a process for data users to apply to access and use the data; legally enforceable data use agreements to which data users must consent; a clear and robust oversight process for data access and use, including a data management plan, that ensures compliance with state and federal data privacy laws; agreements for state agencies and the University of Minnesota to ensure proper and efficient use and security of data; and technical assistance for users of the data and for stakeholders; (2) deleted text begin develop adeleted text end new text begin assess fees according to thenew text end fee schedule new text begin in subdivision 14 new text end to support the cost of expanded access to and use of the data, provided the fees charged under the schedule do not create a barrier to access or use for those most affected by disparities; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (3) create a research advisory group to advise the commissioner on applications for data use under this subdivision, including an examination of the rigor of the research approach, the technical capabilities of the proposed user, and the ability of the proposed user to successfully safeguard the datadeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (4) annually publish on the Department of Health website a list of projects authorized under this subdivision. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 62U.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 14. new text end new text begin Fees for expanded access to and use of the all-payer claims database. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "custom data set or analysis" means a de-identified data set or report for which a standard data set or limited use data sets are not appropriate, that only provides the minimum necessary data, and that is de-identified using the expert determination method as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514(b)(1); new text end new text begin (2) "data file" means a data file derived from medical claims, pharmacy claims, dental claims, eligibility information, membership information, or provider information for a single year; new text end new text begin (3) "limited use data set" means a data set that meets the requirements in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514(e)(2), and may include protected health information from which certain direct identifiers of individuals have been removed under the principle of minimum information necessary; and new text end new text begin (4) "standard data set" means a static data release designed by the commissioner to serve a wide range of projects in which nearly all de-identified data elements are disclosed in one release after applying the safe harbor de-identification method defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 164.514(b)(2), and from which protected health information and any combination of data elements that directly identify any person are excluded. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must assess fees on an individual or organization that receives data under subdivision 13 for the cost of accessing or receiving the data. Costs under this paragraph may include but are not limited to the cost of producing and releasing data to the individual or organization under subdivision 13 and managing infrastructure and operations. The commissioner must assess fees according to the following schedule based on the type of data requested and number of years for which access is requested: new text end new text begin (1) the fee for a standard data set is $3,500 per data file per year; new text end new text begin (2) the fee for a limited use data set is $7,000 per data file per year; and new text end new text begin (3) the fee for a custom data set or analysis is $89 per hour of staff time expended, with fees not to exceed the cost of 65 hours of staff time. new text end new text begin (c) An individual or organization that receives approval to access or receive data under subdivision 13 must pay all the required fees in full before accessing or receiving the requested data. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may grant a partial or full waiver of the fees in paragraph (b) if the individual or organization requesting the data meets at least one of the following criteria: new text end new text begin (1) the fees represent a financial hardship to the individual or organization; new text end new text begin (2) the organization is a self-insured data submitter under this section; new text end new text begin (3) the individual or organization is affiliated with an academic institution; new text end new text begin (4) the individual or organization requests a high volume of data files; or new text end new text begin (5) the request is from a Tribal health director for, or the governing body of, one of the 11 federally recognized Tribes in Minnesota. new text end new text begin In determining whether to grant a waiver under this paragraph, the commissioner may consult the research advisory group established under subdivision 13. new text end new text begin (e) Fees paid by an individual or organization approved to access or receive data under subdivision 13 are nonrefundable. Fees collected under this subdivision must be deposited into an account in the special revenue fund. Money in that account does not cancel and is appropriated to the commissioner to offset the cost of providing access to data under subdivision 13 and maintaining data submitted under subdivisions 4 to 5b. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner must publish the fee schedule in paragraph (b) on the Department of Health website. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 144.125, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Duty to perform testing. (a) It is the duty of (1) the administrative officer or other person in charge of each institution caring for infants 28 days or less of age, (2) the person required in pursuance of the provisions of section 144.215, to register the birth of a child, or (3) the nurse midwife or midwife in attendance at the birth, to arrange to have administered to every infant or child in its care tests for heritable and congenital disorders according to subdivision 2 and rules prescribed by the state commissioner of health. (b) Testing, recording of test results, reporting of test results, and follow-up of infants with heritable congenital disorders, including hearing loss detected through the early hearing detection and intervention program in section 144.966, shall be performed at the times and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner of health. (c) The fee to support the newborn screening program, including tests administered under this section and section 144.966, shall be $184.35 per specimen. This fee amount shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the state government special revenue fund.new text begin If the individual described in paragraph (a) submits a claim for reimbursement to an insurer but does not receive reimbursement, the individual may request a special fee exemption form from the newborn screening program. To qualify for the exemption, the individual must provide documentation to the newborn screening program that the insurer did not reimburse them.new text end (d) The fee to offset the cost of the support services provided under section 144.966, subdivision 3a, shall be $15 per specimen. This fee shall be deposited in the state treasury and credited to the general fund. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1501, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Availability. (a) The commissioner of health shall use money appropriated for health professional education loan forgiveness in this section: (1) for medical residents, physicians, mental health professionals, and alcohol and drug counselors agreeing to practice in designated rural areas or underserved urban communities or specializing in the area of pediatric psychiatry; (2) for midlevel practitioners agreeing to practice in designated rural areas or to teach at least 12 credit hours, or 720 hours per year in the nursing field in a postsecondary program at the undergraduate level or the equivalent at the graduate level; (3) for nurses who agree to practice in a Minnesota nursing home; in an intermediate care facility for persons with developmental disability; in a hospital if the hospital owns and operates a Minnesota nursing home and a minimum of 50 percent of the hours worked by the nurse is in the nursing home; in an assisted living facility as defined in section 144G.08, subdivision 7; or for a home care provider as defined in section 144A.43, subdivision 4; or agree to teach at least 12 credit hours, or 720 hours per year in the nursing field in a postsecondary program at the undergraduate level or the equivalent at the graduate level; (4) for other health care technicians agreeing to teach at least 12 credit hours, or 720 hours per year in their designated field in a postsecondary program at the undergraduate level or the equivalent at the graduate level. The commissioner, in consultation with the Healthcare Education-Industry Partnership, shall determine the health care fields where the need is the greatest, including, but not limited to, respiratory therapy, clinical laboratory technology, radiologic technology, and surgical technology; (5) for pharmacists, advanced dental therapists, dental therapists, and public health nurses who agree to practice in designated rural areas; (6) for dentists agreeing to deliver at least 25 percent of the dentist's yearly patient encounters to state public program enrollees or patients receiving sliding fee schedule discounts through a formal sliding fee schedule meeting the standards established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services under Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 51c.303; and (7) for nurses employed as a hospital nurse by a nonprofit hospital and providing direct care to patients at the nonprofit hospital. (b) Appropriations made for health professional education loan forgiveness in this section do not cancel and are available until expendeddeleted text begin , except that at the end of each biennium, any remaining balance in the account that is not committed by contract and not needed to fulfill existing commitments shall cancel to the funddeleted text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1503, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Selection process. The commissioner shall determine a maximum award for grants and loan forgiveness, and shall make selections based on the information provided in the grant application, including the demonstrated need for an applicant provider to enhance the education of its workforce, the proposed employee scholarship or loan forgiveness selection process, the applicant's proposed budget, and other criteria as determined by the commissioner. Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, amounts appropriated for purposes of this section do not cancel and are available until expendeddeleted text begin , except that at the end of each biennium, any remaining amount that is not committed by contract and not needed to fulfill existing commitments shall cancel to the general funddeleted text end . Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1505, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply: (1) "eligible advanced practice registered nurse program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is currently accredited as a master's, doctoral, or postgraduate level advanced practice registered nurse program by the Commission on Collegiate Nursing Education or by the Accreditation Commission for Education in Nursing, or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin has presented a credible plan asnew text end a candidate for accreditation; (2) "eligible dental therapy program" means a dental therapy education program or advanced dental therapy education program that is located in Minnesota and is either: (i) approved by the Board of Dentistry; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (ii) currently accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation;new text begin ornew text end new text begin (iii) has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditation; new text end (3) "eligible mental health professional program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is deleted text begin listeddeleted text end new text begin currently accredited new text end as a mental health professional program by the appropriate accrediting body for clinical social work, psychology, marriage and family therapy, or licensed professional clinical counseling, or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin has presented a credible plan asnew text end a candidate for accreditation; (4) "eligible pharmacy program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is currently accredited as a doctor of pharmacy program by the Accreditation Council on Pharmacy Educationnew text begin or has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditationnew text end ; (5) "eligible physician assistant program" means a program that is located in Minnesota and is currently accredited as a physician assistant program by the Accreditation Review Commission on Education for the Physician Assistant, or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin has presented a credible plan asnew text end a candidate for accreditation; (6) "mental health professional" means an individual providing clinical services in the treatment of mental illness who meets one of the qualifications under section 245.462, subdivision 18; (7) "eligible physician training program" means new text begin a medical school training program or new text end a physician residency training program located in Minnesota and that is currently accredited by the accrediting body or has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditation; (8) "eligible dental program" means a dental education program or a dental residency training program located in Minnesota and that is currently accredited by the accrediting body or has presented a credible plan as a candidate for accreditation; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (9) new text begin "rural community" means a Tribal Nation, statutory city, home rule charter city, or township in Minnesota that is outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, excluding the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud;new text end new text begin (10) "underserved community" means a Minnesota area or population included in the list of designated primary medical care health professional shortage areas, medically underserved areas, or medically underserved populations maintained and updated by the United States Department of Health and Human Services; and new text end new text begin (11) new text end "project" means a project to deleted text begin establish or expanddeleted text end new text begin (i) plan or implement a new eligible new text end clinical training deleted text begin for physician assistants, advanced practice registered nurses, pharmacists, dental therapists, advanced dental therapists, or mental health professionals in Minnesotadeleted text end new text begin program or increase the base number of trainees in an existing eligible clinical training program, or (ii) add or expand rural rotations or clinical training experiences in an existing eligible clinical training programnew text end . Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1505, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Programs. (a) For advanced practice provider clinical training expansion grants, the commissioner of health shall award deleted text begin health professional training sitedeleted text end grants to eligible physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, pharmacy, dental therapy, and mental health professional programs to plan and implement deleted text begin expandeddeleted text end new text begin a new eligible clinical training program or increase the base number of trainees in an existing eligible new text end clinical trainingnew text begin programnew text end . new text begin Clinical training must take place in rural or underserved communities. new text end A planning grant shall not exceed $75,000, and a three-year training grant shall not exceed $300,000 per project. The commissioner may provide a deleted text begin one-year,deleted text end no-cost extension for grants. (b) For health professional rural deleted text begin and underserveddeleted text end clinical rotations grants, the commissioner of health shall award deleted text begin health professional training sitedeleted text end grants to new text begin existing new text end eligible physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, pharmacy, dentistry, dental therapy, and mental health professional new text begin training new text end programs to deleted text begin augment existing clinical deleted text end deleted text begin training programs todeleted text end addnew text begin , expand, or enhancenew text end rural deleted text begin and underserveddeleted text end rotations or clinical training experiences, such as credential or certificate rural tracks or other specialized training. new text begin Rotations and clinical training experiences must take place in rural communities. new text end For physician and dentist training, the expanded training must include rotations in primary care settings such as community clinics, hospitals, health maintenance organizations, or practices in rural communities. (c) new text begin Advanced practice provider clinical training expansion grant new text end funds may be used for: (1) deleted text begin establishing or expanding rotationsdeleted text end new text begin planningnew text end and new text begin implementing a new new text end clinical trainingnew text begin program or increasing the base number of trainees in an existing clinical training program as described in paragraph (a)new text end ; (2) recruitment, training, and retention of students deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end facultynew text begin , and preceptorsnew text end ; (3) connecting students with appropriate clinical training sites, internships, practicums, or externship deleted text begin activitiesdeleted text end new text begin opportunitiesnew text end ; (4) travel and lodging for students; (5) faculty, student, and preceptor salaries, incentives, or other financial support; (6) development and implementation of new text begin health equity and new text end cultural deleted text begin competencydeleted text end new text begin responsiveness new text end training; (7) evaluationsnew text begin of the clinical training program to inform program improvementsnew text end ; (8) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required to establish, maintain, or expand a training program; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (9) supporting clinical education in which trainees are part of a primary care team modeldeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (10) onboarding expenses for trainees to meet clinical training site requirements. new text end new text begin (d) Health professional rural clinical rotation grant funds may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) adding, expanding, or enhancing rural rotations and clinical training experiences in an existing clinical training program as described in paragraph (b); new text end new text begin (2) recruitment, training, and retention of students, faculty, and preceptors; new text end new text begin (3) connecting students with appropriate clinical training sites, internships, practicums, or externship opportunities; new text end new text begin (4) travel and lodging for students; new text end new text begin (5) faculty, student, and preceptor salaries, stipends, or other financial support; new text end new text begin (6) development and implementation of health equity and cultural responsiveness training; new text end new text begin (7) evaluations of the rural rotation or clinical training experience to inform program improvements; new text end new text begin (8) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required to establish or expand rural rotations or clinical training experiences; new text end new text begin (9) supporting clinical education in which trainees are part of a primary care team model; and new text end new text begin (10) onboarding expenses for trainees to meet clinical training site requirements. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1505, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Applications. Eligible physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, pharmacy, dental therapy, dental, physician, and mental health professional programs seeking a grant shall apply to the commissioner. Applications new text begin for advanced practice provider clinical training expansion grants new text end must include a description of the number of additional students who will be trained using grant fundsdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin and new text end attestation that funding will be used to support an increase in the number of clinical training slotsdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin .new text end new text begin All applications must includenew text end a description of the problem that the proposed project will address; a description of the project, including all costs associated with the project, sources of funds for the project, detailed uses of all funds for the project, and the results expecteddeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin ,new text end and a plan to maintain or operate deleted text begin any component included indeleted text end the project after the grant periodnew text begin , including a description of potential barriers to sustainabilitynew text end . deleted text begin The applicantdeleted text end new text begin Applicantsnew text end must describe achievable objectives, a timetable, and roles and capabilities of responsible individuals in the organization. deleted text begin Applicants applying under subdivision 2, paragraph (b),deleted text end new text begin Applications for rural clinical rotation grantsnew text end must include new text begin a description of the new, expanded, or enhanced rural rotations or clinical training experiences; attestation that funding will be used to support improved rural clinical training experiences; and new text end information about length of training and training site settings, geographic location of rural sites, and rural populations expected to be served. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Eligible program" means a program that meets the following criteria: (1) is located in Minnesota; (2) trains medical residents in the specialties of family medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, psychiatry, geriatrics, or general surgery in rural residency training programs or in community-based ambulatory care centers that primarily serve the underservednew text begin , or trains postdoctoral psychology residentsnew text end ; and (3) is accredited by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education new text begin or the American Psychological Association new text end or presents a credible plan to obtain accreditation. new text begin (c) "Rural community" means a Tribal Nation, statutory city, home rule charter city, or township in Minnesota that is outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2, excluding the cities of Duluth, Mankato, Moorhead, Rochester, and St. Cloud. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Rural residency training program" means a new text begin rural medical new text end residency program new text begin or a rural psychology residency program new text end that provides deleted text begin an initial year ofdeleted text end training in an accredited residency program in Minnesota. deleted text begin The subsequent years of the residency program aredeleted text end new text begin At least two-thirds of the residency training must benew text end based in rural communities, utilizing local clinics and community hospitals, with specialty rotations in nearby regional medical centers.new text begin When specialty rotations cannot be fulfilled within rural communities, training may occur in regional or urban sites as long as at least one-half of all training occurs in rural communities. For residency training programs in general surgery, pediatrics, and psychiatry, at least one-half of the residency training must be based in communities outside the seven-county metropolitan area, with rotations in rural communities.new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Community-based ambulatory care centers" means federally qualified health centers, community mental health centers, rural health clinics, health centers operated by the Indian Health Service, an Indian Tribe or Tribal organization, or an urban American Indian organization or an entity receiving funds under Title X of the Public Health Service Act. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Eligible project" means a project to establish and maintain a rural residency training program. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Rural residency training program. (a) The commissioner of health shall award rural residency training program grants to eligible programs to plan, implement, and sustain rural residency training programs. A rural new text begin medical new text end residency training program grant shall not exceed $250,000 per year for up to three years for planning and development, and $225,000 per resident per year for each year thereafter to sustain the program.new text begin A rural psychology residency training program grant shall not exceed $150,000 per year for up to three years for planning and development, and $150,000 per resident per year for each year thereafter to sustain the program. Medical and psychology residency programs that meet eligibility guidelines and continue to demonstrate financial need will be granted sustaining funds, renewable every five years.new text end (b) Funds may be spent to cover the costs of: (1) planning related to establishing accredited rural residency training programs; (2) obtaining accreditation by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Educationnew text begin , the American Psychological Association,new text end or another national body that accredits rural residency training programs; (3) establishing new rural residency training programs; (4) recruitment, training, and retention of new residents and faculty related to the new rural residency training program; (5) travel and lodging for new residents; (6) faculty, new resident, and preceptor salaries related to new rural residency training programs; (7) training site improvements, fees, equipment, and supplies required for new rural residency training programs; and (8) supporting clinical education in which trainees are part of a primary care team model. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Consideration of grant applications. The commissioner shall review each application to determine if the residency program application is complete, if the proposed rural residency program and residency slots are eligible for a grant, and if the program is eligible for federal graduate medical education funding, and when the funding is available. If eligible programs are not eligible for federal graduate medical education funding, the commissioner may award continuation funding to the eligible program beyond the initial grant periodnew text begin without requiring a competitive applicationnew text end . The commissioner shall award grants to support training programs in family medicine, general internal medicine, general pediatrics, psychiatry, geriatrics, general surgery,new text begin psychology,new text end and other primary care focus areas. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1507, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Clinical training program coordination. new text end new text begin The commissioner may award grants to the University of Minnesota to provide technical assistance to residency training programs for coordinated development of rural clinical training programs. new text end Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1911, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment. The international medical graduates assistance program is established to address barriers to practice and facilitate pathways to assist immigrant international medical graduates to integrate into the Minnesota health care delivery system, with the goal of increasing access to primary care in rural and underserved areas of the state.new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, appropriations made to the program do not cancel and are available until expended.new text end Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1911, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Clinical preparation. (a) The commissioner shall award grants to support clinical preparation for Minnesota international medical graduates needing additional clinical preparation or experience to qualify for residency. The grant program shall include: (1) proposed training curricula; (2) associated policies and procedures for clinical training sites, which must be part of existing clinical medical education programs in Minnesota; and (3) monthly stipends for international medical graduate participants. Priority shall be given to primary care sites in rural or underserved areas of the statedeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end International medical graduate participants new text begin who receive support from the international medical graduate primary care residency grant program new text end must commit to serving at least five years in a rural or underserved community of the state. (b) The policies and procedures for the clinical preparation grants must be developed by December 31, 2015, including an implementation schedule that begins awarding grants to clinical preparation programs beginning in June of 2016. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.1911, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. International medical graduate primary care residency grant program and revolving account. (a) The commissioner shall award grants to support primary care residency positions designated for Minnesota immigrant physicians who are willing to serve in rural or underserved areas of the state. No grant shall exceed $150,000 per residency position per year. Eligible primary care residency grant recipients include accredited family medicine, general surgery, internal medicine, obstetrics and gynecology, psychiatry, and pediatric residency programs. Eligible primary care residency programs shall apply to the commissioner. Applications must include the number of anticipated residents to be funded using grant funds and a budget. deleted text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds awarded to grantees in a grant agreement do not lapse until the grant agreement expires.deleted text end Before any funds are distributed, a grant recipient shall provide the commissioner with the following: (1) a copy of the signed contract between the primary care residency program and the participating international medical graduate; (2) certification that the participating international medical graduate has lived in Minnesota for at least two years and is certified by the Educational Commission on Foreign Medical Graduates. Residency programs may also require that participating international medical graduates hold a Minnesota certificate of clinical readiness for residency, once the certificates become available; and (3) verification that the participating international medical graduate has executed a participant agreement pursuant to paragraph (b). (b) Upon acceptance by a participating residency program, international medical graduates shall enter into an agreement with the commissioner to provide primary care for at least five years in a rural or underserved area of Minnesota after graduating from the residency program and make payments to the revolving international medical graduate residency account for five years beginning in their second year of postresidency employment. Participants shall pay $15,000 or ten percent of their annual compensation each year, whichever is less. (c) A revolving international medical graduate residency account is established as an account in the special revenue fund in the state treasury. The commissioner of management and budget shall credit to the account appropriations, payments, and transfers to the account. Earnings, such as interest, dividends, and any other earnings arising from fund assets, must be credited to the account. Funds in the account are appropriated annually to the commissioner to award grants and administer the grant program established in paragraph (a). Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any funds deposited in the account do not expire. The commissioner may accept contributions to the account from private sector entities subject to the following provisions: (1) the contributing entity may not specify the recipient or recipients of any grant issued under this subdivision; (2) the commissioner shall make public the identity of any private contributor to the account, as well as the amount of the contribution provided; and (3) a contributing entity may not specify that the recipient or recipients of any funds use specific products or services, nor may the contributing entity imply that a contribution is an endorsement of any specific product or service.